Utah statutes.
65A-10-3.   Establishment of sovereign land boundaries.
(1)  The division, after consultation with the attorney general and affected
state agencies, shall develop plans for the resolution of disputes over the
location of sovereign land boundaries.
(2)  The division, after notice to affected state agencies and any person with
an ownership interest in the land, may enter into agreements with owners of
land adjoining navigable lakes and streams to establish sovereign land
boundaries.
